Hawaii statutes.
§412:3-209 Paid-in capital and
surplus. (a) Every financial institution existing or organized under the
laws of this State shall at all times, and every applicant in organization
shall before filing the final application for a charter or license under this
part and at all times thereafter, have paid-in capital and surplus of not less
than the following amounts for each type of institution specified below:

Banks $5,000,000

Savings banks $3,000,000

Savings and loan associations $2,000,000

Trust companies $1,500,000

Depository financial services

loan companies $1,000,000

(b) The initial paid-in capital and surplus of
each financial institution shall be in money or in the form of such other
property as may be authorized by the board of directors and approved in writing
by the commissioner. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Cross References

Nondepository financial services loan companies, paid-in
capital and surplus, see §412:3-306.

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next